Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-319.02
Domestic companies; securities; amount required.

Every domestic insurer hereafter organized to transact the business of insurance in this state shall deposit and continually maintain with the Department of Insurance eligible securities for the benefit of all of its policyholders or policyholders and creditors in the United States in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars.

Laws 1955, c. 174, § 2, p. 499;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 96;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 51.